New York, session 2025-2026, S10006.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (g) of subdivision 1 of section 1399-q of the 2 public health law is REPEALED. 3 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 4 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00433-01-5